zh-CN: 包袋尺寸描述: 超大号; 大号; 中号; 微型; 迷你; 纳米; 加大号; 小号; 其他
hr-HR: Opis veličine torbe: Iznimno veliko; Veliko; Srednje; Mikro; Mini; Nano; Predimenzionirano; Malo; Ostalo
zh-TW: 包袋尺寸交易描述: 特大; 大; 中; 微型; 迷你; 奈米; 超大; 小; 其他
nb: Bag størrelsesbeskrivelse: Ekstra stor; Stor; Medium; Mikro; Mini; Nano; Oversized; Liten; Annet
sk-SK: Deskriptor veľkosti vaku: Extra veľká; Veľká; Stredná; Mikro; Mini; Nano; Oversize; Malá; Iná
fi: Laukku koon määrite: Erittäin suuri; Suuri; Keskikokoinen; Mikro; Mini; Nano; Ylisuuri; Pieni; Muu
de: Taschengrößenbeschreibung: Extra groß; Groß; Mittel; Micro; Mini; Nano; Oversized; Klein; Sonstige
pt-BR: Descritor do tamanho da bolsa: Extragrande; Grande; Médio; Micro; Mini; Nano; Oversized; Pequeno; Outro
el: Περιγραφικός δείκτης μεγέθους σάκου: Εξαιρετικά μεγάλο; Μεγάλο; Μεσαίο; Micro; Μίνι; Nano; Υπερμεγέθες; Μικρό; Άλλο
da: Beskrivelse af beholderens størrelse: Ekstra stor; Stor; Mellem; Mikro; Mini; Nano; Oversized; Lille; Andet
pt-PT: Descritor do tamanho do saco: Extra grande; Grande; Médio; Micro; Mini; Nano; Sobredimensionado; Pequeno; Outro
ro-RO: Descriptor pentru mărimea sacului: Extra mare; Mare; Mediu; Micro; Mini; Nano; Supradimensionat; Mic; Altele
cs: Velikost tašky (deskriptor): Extra velké; Velké; Střední; Mikro; Mini; Nano; Nadměrné; Malé; Jiné
lt-LT: Krepšio dydžio apibūdinimas: Labai didelis; Didelis; Vidutinis; Mikro; Mini; Nano; Ypač didelis; Mažas; Kita
it: Descrittore della dimensione della borsa: Extra large; Grande; Medio; Micro; Mini; Nano; Oversize; Piccolo; Altro
ko: 백 크기 구분: 엑스트라 라지; 라지; 미디엄; 마이크로; 미니; 나노; 오버사이즈; 스몰; 기타
vi: Mô tả kích thước túi: Cực lớn; Lớn; Vừa; Siêu nhỏ; Mini; Nano; Ngoại cỡ; Nhỏ; Khác
nl: Tas maataanduiding: Extra groot; Groot; Medium; Micro; Mini; Nano; Oversized; Klein; Overig
th: ตัวบ่งชี้ขนาดกระเป๋า: ใหญ่พิเศษ; ใหญ่; กลาง; ไมโคร; มินิ; นาโน; โอเวอร์ไซส์; เล็ก; อื่นๆ
tr: Çanta boyut sınıfı: Ekstra büyük; Büyük; Orta; Mikro; Mini; Nano; Oversize; Küçük; Diğer
es: Descripción del tamaño del bolso: Extragrande; Grande; Mediano; Micro; Mini; Nano; Extragrande; Pequeño; Otro
pl: Określenie rozmiaru torby: Bardzo duży; Duży; Średni; Mikro; Mini; Nano; Oversize; Mały; Inne
sv: Väskans storleksguide: Extra stor; Stor; Mellan; Mikro; Mini; Nano; Överdimensionerad; Liten; Övrigt
ja: バッグのサイズ表記: XL; L; M; マイクロ; ミニ; ナノ; オーバーサイズ; S; その他
ru: Описание размера сумки: Очень большой; Большой; Средний; Микро; Мини; Нано; Оверсайз; Маленький; Другое
sl-SI: Opis velikosti torbice: Izjemno velika; Velika; Srednja; Mikro; Mini; Nano; Oversized; Majhna; Drugo
en: Bag size descriptor: Extra large; Large; Medium; Micro; Mini; Nano; Oversized; Small; Other
fr: Indicateur de taille du sac: Très grand; Grand; Moyen; Micro; Mini; Nano; Surdimensionné; Petit; Autre
hu: Zsákméretleíró: Extra nagy; Nagy; Közepes; Mikro; Mini; Nano; Túlméretezett; Kicsi; Egyéb
bg-BG: Описание на размера на чантата: Много голям; Голям; Среден; Микро; Мини; Нано; Оувърсайз; Малък; Друго